Vermont, session 2025-2026, H859.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Psychedelic Therapy Advisory Board* * *
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 126, an act relating to the
establishment of the Psychedelic Therapy Advisory Working Group, was
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 2 of 12
enacted by the Vermont General Assembly “for the purpose of reviewing
existing research on the cost-benefit profile of the use of psychedelics to
improve mental health and to make findings and recommendations regarding
the advisability of the establishment of a State program to permit health care
providers to administer psychedelics in a therapeutic setting and the impact on
public health of allowing individuals to legally access psychedelics under State
law”;
(2) on November 12, 2024, the Psychedelic Therapy Advisory Working
Group issued a report recommending the “[extension] of the current [W]orking
[G]roup with the expansion of participants to monitor the evolution of research
and programs across the country and to facilitate the ability to research
psychedelic therapies in Vermont”;
(3) the current federal administration has acknowledged the benefits of
psychedelic treatments in a clinical setting to treat trauma and mental health
conditions and it supports ramping up clinical drug development trials to
enable doctors’ prescription of psychedelic medicines soon;
(4) according to the Texas Ibogaine Initiative, Texas has approved
$50,000,000.00 in state funding to drug development trials for ibogaine as “a
breakthrough treatment for substance use disorder, trauma-related conditions,
and traumatic brain injury”; and
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 3 of 12
(5) establishing a Psychedelic Therapy Advisory Board in Vermont is a
step toward Americans for Ibogaine’s goal of establishing “the medicalization
of ibogaine in the United States—specifically, the successful completion of
Phase 3 clinical trials, and ultimately, FDA approval.”
Sec. 2. PSYCHEDELIC THERAPY ADVISORY BOARD
(a) Creation. There is created the Psychedelic Therapy Advisory Board for
the purposes of:
(1) reviewing existing research and the cost-benefit profile regarding
whether the use of psychedelic therapy improves health and well-being,
including mental health and substance use disorders;
(2) proposing recommendations regarding the establishment of a State
program to permit health care providers to administer psychedelics in a
therapeutic setting;
(3) providing an updated assessment of the public health impact of
allowing individuals to legally access psychedelic medications under State law;
and
(4) exploring the potential of interstate partnership through research and
development of novel treatments.
(b) Membership. The Advisory Board shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Secretary of Human Services or designee;
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 4 of 12
(2) the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation or designee;
(3) a health care professional licensed or certified in Vermont with
specialized training in psychedelic therapy or research, appointed by the
Commissioner of Health;
(4) an attorney licensed in Vermont with experience practicing in the
health care field, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Vermont Supreme
Court;
(5) a physician licensed in the State with experience in the treatment of
trauma, substance use disorders, and other health conditions resistant to
existing treatments, appointed by the Vermont Medical Society;
(6) a psychologist licensed in the State with experience in the treatment
of trauma, substance use disorders, and other conditions resistant to existing
treatments, appointed by the President of the Vermont Psychological
Association;
(7) a social worker licensed in this State with experience in the
treatment of trauma, substance use disorders, and other health conditions
resistant to existing treatments, appointed by the Vermont chapter of the
National Association of Social Workers; and
(8) three individuals with lived experience of benefitting from
psychedelic therapy, one appointed by the Vermont chapter of the National
Alliance on Mental Illness, one appointed by the Vermont Association for
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 5 of 12
Mental Health and Addiction Recovery, and one appointed by the Vermont
chapter of Veterans of Foreign Wars.
(c) Powers and duties. The Advisory Board shall:
(1) review the latest research and evidence of the public health benefits
and risks of clinical psychedelic treatment;
(2) monitor the laws and programs in other states that have authorized
the use of psychedelic medication by health care providers in therapeutic
settings and the necessary components and resources for Vermont to pursue a
similar practice;
(3) consider how Vermont can develop and fund harm reduction training
and education for health care professionals and the public regarding the use of
psilocybin and other psychedelic medications;
(4) propose a pilot project for the use of psilocybin-assisted therapies in
end-of-life care or for individuals with serious illnesses, trauma, or mental
health or substance use disorders; and
(5) participate in a research program to evaluate the medical potential of
psychedelic treatments, beginning with the ibogaine initiative in Texas, and
propose pathways for moving forward with research and development of novel
psychedelic treatments.
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 6 of 12
(d) Assistance. The Advisory Board shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Agency of Human Services, in
collaboration with the Vermont Psychological Association.
(e) Report. On or before January 15, 2027, the Advisory Board shall
submit a written report to the House Committees on Health Care and on
Human Services and to the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare with its
findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Secretary of Human Services or designee shall call the first
meeting of the Advisory Board to occur on or before August 15, 2026.
(2) The Advisory Board shall select a chair from among its members at
the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Advisory Board shall cease to exist on July 1, 2027.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Advisory Board
who are not participating in their professional capacities shall be entitled to per
diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under
32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than eight meetings. Payments to members of
the Advisory Board authorized under this subsection shall be made from
monies appropriated to the Agency of Human Services.
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 7 of 12
* * * Ibogaine Clinical Drug Trials * * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 14 is added to read:
§ 14. IBOGAINE CLINICAL DRUG TRIALS
(a) The Department of Health shall execute a contract with a Vermont
entity to conduct certified clinical drug development trials related to the use of
ibogaine for the treatment of opioid use disorder, co-occurring substance use
disorder, or any other mental health or neurological conditions for which
ibogaine demonstrates efficacy.
(b) Prior to entering the contract described in subsection (a) of this section,
the Department shall obtain the following information from a proposed
Vermont entity:
(1) a detailed description of the Vermont entity’s strategy for obtaining
approval for ibogaine from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration through
sanctioned clinical drug development trials, including a detailed clinical drug
development trial design;
(2) a description of the composition of the drug development clinical
trial team and team members’ expertise;
(3) the Vermont entity’s plan to submit an investigational new drug
application, if it has not already done so;
(4) the Vermont entity’s plan to seek a breakthrough therapy designation
pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 356 to expedite the clinical drug development trials;
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 8 of 12
(5) protocols for clinical drug development trial participant recruitment,
patient screening criteria, administration, aftercare, and post-acute treatment
support; and
(6) certification of an existing ibogaine drug development agreement
with one or more other states or state-sponsored consortia.
(c) Before the Department contracts with a Vermont entity, the Department
shall negotiate a contract requiring that the Vermont entity:
(1) match the State’s investment in ibogaine clinical drug development
trials with an equal amount of additional funding and devote this total amount
to clinical drug development trials conducted within the State, using in-state
facilities and Vermont residents as clinical drug development trial participants;
(2) work with mental health professionals who are licensed or certified
in Vermont;
(3) comply with the reporting requirements in this section;
(4) establish a plan to ensure broad and accessible ibogaine treatment
access to patients within the State following the approval of ibogaine by the
U.S. Food and Drug Administration by diverse means, including:
(A) providing priority access to ibogaine treatment to residents of the
State;
(B) seeking third-party access to ibogaine treatment within the State;
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 9 of 12
(C) developing means of access to ibogaine treatment within the
State for uninsured and low-income individuals; and
(D) training and credentialing health care professionals within the
State to administer ibogaine treatment; and
(5) provide a plan recognizing the State’s economic interest in the
intellectual property generated over the course of the ibogaine clinical drug
development trials that shares the proceeds from the intellectual property in a
manner proportional to the State’s contribution to the total cost of the clinical
drug development trials, which shall be deposited into the State’s Ibogaine
Intellectual Property Special Fund established pursuant to subsection (f) of this
section.
(d) In negotiating a contract with a Vermont entity, the Department may
agree to additional terms that make reasonable deviations from the
requirements of this section where it results in a contract that is fair and creates
at least substantially equivalent value for the State.
(e) For the purposes of this section, intellectual property rights and other
economic rights accruing to the State arising from ibogaine clinical drug
development trials shall include the following as related to the clinical drug
development trials:
(1) intellectual property, technology, and inventions;
(2) patents, trademarks, and licenses;
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 10 of 12
(3) trade secrets, data, and databases;
(4) tools, methods, and processes;
(5) treatment models or techniques;
(6) administration protocols; and
(7) works of authorship.
(f) There is created the Ibogaine Intellectual Property Special Fund, a
special fund established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7,
subchapter 5 and administered by the Department. The Ibogaine Intellectual
Property Special Fund shall consist of all proceeds from the commercialization
of intellectual property created in relation to ibogaine clinical drug
development trials conducted pursuant to this section. Expenditures from this
Special Fund shall be used only for programs or research benefitting
populations that suffer from conditions treatable with ibogaine, including
individuals with a traumatic brain injury, opioid use disorder, co-occurring
substance use disorder, or other neurological or mental health disorders.
(g)(1) Once the Department has entered into a contract with a Vermont
entity pursuant to this section, the Vermont entity shall prepare and submit the
following to the Department on a quarterly basis until the ibogaine clinical
drug development trial is completed or otherwise terminated:
(A) a report on the progress of the ibogaine clinical drug
development trials conducted pursuant to this section; and
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 11 of 12
(B) a financial status report, including information to verify
expenditures of State funds and required matching funds.
(2) Annually on or before December, until the ibogaine clinical drug
development trials are completed or otherwise terminated, the Department
shall submit a written report to the House Committees on Health Care and on
Human Services and to the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare
describing the progress of the ibogaine clinical drug development trials and
their related financial status.
(h) A health care professional who prescribes, dispenses, or distributes
ibogaine as part of an ibogaine clinical drug development trial authorized in
this section shall be immune from civil or criminal liability, unless the health
care professional’s actions with regard to prescribing, dispensing, or
distributing ibogaine constituted recklessness, gross negligence, or intentional
misconduct.
(i) As used in this section:
(1) “Health care professional” means a physician licensed pursuant to 26
V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33, a physician assistant licensed to prescribe and
dispense prescription drugs pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 31, an advanced
practice registered nurse authorized to prescribe and dispense prescription
drugs pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 28, or a pharmacist licensed pursuant to 26
V.S.A. chapter 36.
VT LEG #386193 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.859
2026 Page 12 of 12
(2) “Ibogaine” means ibogaine and ibogaine-based therapeutics,
including ibogaine analogs.
(3) “Vermont entity” means a private-public partnership, for-profit or
nonprofit organization, or public benefit corporation located in Vermont that is
authorized to conduct drug development trials by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration and that has entered into an ibogaine drug development and
manufacturing contract with another state planning to conduct drug
development trials to obtain U.S. Food and Drug Administration approval for
the use of ibogaine.
Sec. 4. APPROPRIATION; IBOGAINE CLINICAL DRUG
DEVELOPMENT TRIALS
In fiscal year 2025, $300,000.00 is appropriated from the Opioid Abatement
Special Fund established in 18 V.S.A. § 4774 to the Department of Health for
the purpose of executing a contract with a Vermont entity to conduct certified
clinical drug development trials related to the use of ibogaine for the treatment
of opioid use disorder, co-occurring substance use disorder, or any other
mental health or neurological conditions for which ibogaine demonstrates
efficacy pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 14.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386193 v.2